Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2439
Permit; application for revocation; prosecution; fine; costs.

(1) Any peace officer having probable cause to believe that a permitholder is no longer in compliance with one or more requirements of section 69-2433, except as provided in subsection (2) of section 69-2443, shall bring an application for revocation of the permit to be prosecuted as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) It is the duty of the county attorney or his or her deputy of the county in which such permitholder resides to prosecute a case for the revocation of a permit to carry a concealed handgun brought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. In case the county attorney refuses or is unable to prosecute the case, the duty to prosecute shall be upon the Attorney General or his or her assistant.

(3) The case shall be prosecuted as a civil case, and the permit shall be revoked upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the permitholder does not meet one or more of the requirements of section 69-2433, except as provided in subsection (2) of section 69-2443.

(4) A person who has his or her permit revoked under this section may be fined up to one thousand dollars and shall be charged with the costs of the prosecution. The money collected under this subsection as an administrative fine shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB807, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 19.